Washington statutes.
RCW 25.10.221

Statement of termination.

A dissolved limited partnership that has completed winding up may deliver to the secretary of state for filing a statement of termination that states:

(1) The name of the limited partnership;

(2) The date of filing of its initial certificate of limited partnership; and

(3) Any other information as determined by the general partners filing the statement or by a person appointed pursuant to RCW 25.10.581 (3) or (4).

[ 2009 c 188 s 203.]